Utah statutes.
53A-1-608.   Preparation for tests.
(1)  School district employees may not carry on any specific instruction or
preparation of students which would be a breach of testing ethics, such as the
teaching of specific test questions.
(2)  School district employees who administer the test shall follow the
standardization procedures in the publisher's test administration manual and
any additional specific instructions developed by the State Board of
Education.
(3)  The State Board of Education may revoke the certification of an
individual who violates this section.
